Wyoming statutes. Title 1 Code of Civil Procedure
Chapter 25 Change of Name

Am. Jur. 2d, ALR and C.J.S. references. —

57 Am. Jur. 2d Name §§ 9 to 15.

Rights and remedies of parents inter se with respect to the names of their children, 53 ALR2d 914.

Right of married woman to use maiden surname, 67 ALR3d 1266.

Circumstances justifying grant or denial of petition to change adult's name, 79 ALR3d 562.

65 C.J.S. Names §§ 21 to 28.

§ 1-25-101.
Verified petition to be presented; information to be shown
in petition; order of court making change; record to be made.

Every person desiring
to change his name may petition the district court of the county of
the petitioner’s residence for the desired change. The petition shall
be verified by affidavit setting forth the petitioner’s full name,
the name desired, a concise statement of the reason for the desired
change, the place of his birth, his place of residence and the length
of time he has been an actual bona fide resident of the county in
which the petition is filed. If the court is satisfied that the desired
change is proper and not detrimental to the interests of any other
person, it shall order the change to be made, and record the proceedings
in the records of the court. In the event
a confidentiality order has been entered pursuant to W.S.

35-21-112

or any other court order allowing a party to maintain
confidentiality of addresses, city or state of residence or other
information identifying the residence, the address, city or state
of residence or other information identifying the residence of the
party shall remain confidential.

History.

Laws 1890-91, ch. 44, § 1; R.S. 1899, § 4191; C.S. 1910, § 5051; C.S. 1920, § 6313; R.S. 1931, § 89-4401; C.S. 1945, § 3-5701; W.S. 1957, § 1-739; Laws 1977, ch. 188, § 1; W.S. 1977, §

1-26-101

; 2013 ch. 98, § 2, effective July 1, 2013.

The 2013 amendment,

effective July 1, 2013, added the last sentence.

Child's best interest. —

Mother did not show it was error to deny the mother's petition to change the mother's child's name due to a trial court's failure to consider whether the change was in the child's best interest because (1) such a finding was not statutorily required, and (2) the state of the record made it impossible to find if the trial court considered the child's best interest or if the mother raised the issue. Enh v. Hansley, 2016 WY 86, 378 P.3d 296,

2016 Wyo. LEXIS 93

(Wyo. 2016).

District court properly refused to approve a mother’s statement of the evidence and denied her petition to change her child’s surname because neither party raised the issue of whether the court was required to address the child’s best interests at the hearing or on appeal, both parties made arguments related not only to their own interests, but those of the child, and decisions that involved custody, visitation, and child support were committed to the sound discretion of the district court. Lamb v. Newman (In re Name Change of SGN), 2022 WY 38, 506 P.3d 748,

2022 Wyo. LEXIS 38

(Wyo. 2022).

§ 1-25-102.
Residence requirement.

A person petitioning for a change of name shall have been a bona fide resident of Wyoming for at least six (6) months immediately preceding filing the petition.

History.

Laws 1890-91, ch. 44, § 2; R.S. 1899, § 4192; C.S. 1910, § 5052; C.S. 1920, § 6314; R.S. 1931, § 89-4402; C.S. 1945, § 3-5702; W.S. 1957, § 1-740; Laws 1977, ch. 188, § 1; W.S. 1977, § 1-26-102; 2022 ch. 65, § 1, effective March 15, 2022.

The 2022 amendment

substituted “Wyoming” for “the county in which the petition is filed” and “six (6) months” for “two (2) years.”

Laws 2022, ch. 65, § 2, makes the act effective immediately upon completion of all acts necessary for a bill to become law as provided by art. 4, § 8 of the Wyoming Constitution. Approved March 15, 2022.

§ 1-25-103.
Notice to be given by publication.

Except in a proceeding in which the court has issued a confidentiality order pursuant to W.S.

35-21-112

or any other court order allowing a party to maintain confidentiality of addresses, city or state of residence or other information identifying the residence of the party, public notice of the petition for a change of name shall be given in the same manner as service by publication upon nonresidents in civil actions. Upon good cause shown to the court, public notice shall not be required with respect to a petition for a change of name of a minor.

History.

Laws 1890-91, ch. 44, § 3; R.S. 1899, § 4193; C.S. 1910, § 5053; C.S. 1920, § 6315; R.S. 1931, § 89-4403; C.S. 1945, § 3-5703; W.S. 1957, § 1-741; Laws 1977, ch. 188, § 1; W.S. 1977, § 1-26-103; 2013 ch. 98, § 2, effective July 1, 2013; 2022 ch. 24, § 1, effective July 1, 2022.

The 2013 amendment,

effective July 1, 2013, added “Except in a proceeding in which the court has issued a confidentiality order pursuant to W.S.

35-21-112

or any other court order allowing a party to maintain confidentiality of addresses, city or state of residence or other information identifying the residence of the party.”

The 2022 amendment,

effective July 1, 2022, added the last sentence.

§ 1-25-104.
Change of name in adoption proceedings.

In all cases of the adoption
of children in the manner provided by law, the court before which
such adoption proceeding is held, may change the name of any child
so adopted and make an order to that effect, which shall be recorded
in the records of the proceeding of adoption. Each child who has heretofore,
in Wyoming, been adopted according to law, may have his or her name
changed to that of the parents who have adopted him or her, upon the
parents, who have adopted such child, on behalf of such child, filing
a petition therefor.

History.

Laws 1890-91, ch. 44, § 4; R.S. 1899, § 3028; C.S. 1910, § 3965; C.S. 1920, § 5030; R.S. 1931, § 20-216; C.S. 1945, § 3-5704; W.S. 1957, § 1-742; Laws 1977, ch. 188, § 1; W.S. 1977, § 1-26-104.

Cross references. —

For provision that the decree of adoption of adult may include name change, see §

1-22-113

.

For similar provision concerning adoption of children, see §

1-22-114

.

As to issuance of new birth certificate following adoption, see §

35-1-417

.

Am. Jur. 2d, ALR and C.J.S. references. —

Name of child as changed by adoption, 53 ALR2d 927.